Hawaii statutes.
§571-31.2 Juvenile intake and diagnostic
services. (a) The court or other designated agency shall:

(1) Notify the child's parent, guardian or legal
custodian or take reasonable action to ensure that such notice has been given;

(2) Require the child, the child's parent, the
child's guardian or legal custodian, or both, to appear at the court or other
designated agency as soon as practicable for a family counseling session to
attempt a quick resolution of their problem;

(3) Investigate, evaluate, make necessary
determination, and take appropriate actions regarding:

(A) Diversion from justice system processing,
formal or informal, and closure of the case;

(B) Release of a child to the care of the
child's parent or other responsible adult;

(C) Extending to or making arrangement for
the securing of suitable informal adjustment under section 571-31.4, 571-31.5
or 571-31.6;

(D) Initiation of the filing of a complaint
or petition;

(E) Detention of a child, utilizing the
standard set out in section 571-31.1 or temporary shelter in a nonsecure
shelter; and

(F) Making such other informal disposition as
may be suitable.

(b) If the intake officer believes it
desirable, such officer may take action to obtain the child or the written
promise of a parent, guardian, or legal custodian to take the child to the
court or other designated agency as in section 571‑31(c). The failure of
a parent, guardian, or other legal custodian to produce the child in court or
at the other designated agency as required by an authorized notice may be
pursued as provided in section 571-31(d).

(c) For cases diverted under subsection
(a)(3)(A), intake officers shall compile reports at least monthly enumerating
the aggregate number of cases diverted and the types of alleged offenses
precipitating the referral of the child to the court. These reports shall be
submitted to the administrator of the juvenile client services branch in each
judicial circuit, who shall compile the reports into an annual report for each
judicial circuit, to be submitted to the board of family court judges and the
Hawaii juvenile justice state advisory council. [L 1980, c 303, pt of §5(3); am
L 1988, c 294, §3; am L 2014, c 201, §9]

Note

The 2014 amendment applies to delinquent behavior committed
on or after July 1, 2014. L 2014, c 201, §21.

Rules of Court

Intake procedure, see HFCR rule 123.

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next